Wisconsin, session 2025, SB184.
do enact as follows:SB184,1Section 1. 995.80 of the statutes is created to read:995.80 Regulation based on energy source. (1) Definitions. In this section:(a) “Local governmental unit” means a political subdivision of this state, a special purpose district in this state, an agency or corporation of a political subdivision or special purpose district, or a combination or subunit of any of the foregoing.(b) “Motor vehicle” means a self-propelled device designed to transport persons or property from one place to another.(c) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, commission, independent agency, institution, office, society, or other body in state government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law.(2) Limits on regulation. No state agency and no local governmental unit may do any of the following:(a) Restrict the use or sale of a motor vehicle on the basis of the energy source used to power the motor vehicle, including use for propulsion or use for powering other functions of the motor vehicle. This paragraph does not affect any policy established by a state agency or local governmental unit related to the purchase of motor vehicles for the use of the state agency or local governmental unit.(b) Restrict the use or sale of a device other than a motor vehicle on the basis of the energy source that is used to power the device or that is consumed by the device. Under this paragraph, a device is powered by an energy source or consumes an energy source if any significant function of the device uses that energy source or consumes that energy source to accomplish the function. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb184 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb184 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB184 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB184 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB184: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting